Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.420

Entry-level management training course—Rules—Requirements—Suspension—Waiver—Designation of supervisory or management positions.

(1) The office of financial management, by rule, shall prescribe the conditions under which an employee appointed to a supervisory or management position after June 12, 1980, shall be required to successfully complete an entry-level management training course as approved by the director. Such training shall not be required of any employee who has completed a management training course prior to the employee's appointment which is, in the judgment of the director, at least equivalent to the entry-level course required by this section.

(2) The office of financial management, by rule, shall establish procedures for the suspension of the entry-level training requirement in cases where the ability of an agency to perform its responsibilities is adversely affected, or for the waiver of this requirement in cases where a person has demonstrated experience as a substitute for training.

(3) Agencies subject to the provisions of this chapter, in accordance with rules prescribed by the office of financial management, shall designate individual positions, or groups of positions, as being "supervisory" or "management" positions. Such designations shall be subject to review by the director.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 425; 1980 c 118 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Severability—1980 c 118: See note following RCW 41.06.010.